Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2310
Bonds; security.

The principal of and interest on bonds issued by the corporation shall be secured by a pledge of the revenue and receipts out of which the principal of and interest on the bonds is payable, and may be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust covering all or any part of the projects from which the revenue or receipts pledged may be derived, including any enlargements of and additions to any projects made at a later date. The resolution under which the bonds are authorized to be issued and any mortgage or deed of trust may contain any agreements and provisions respecting the maintenance of the projects covered thereby, the fixing and collection of rents for any portions thereof leased by the corporation to others, the creation and maintenance of special funds from the revenue and the rights and remedies available in the event of default, all as the board of directors deems advisable and not in conflict with the provisions of this section. Each pledge, agreement, mortgage, and deed of trust made for the benefit of security of any of the bonds of the corporation shall continue to be effective until the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of which the pledge, agreement, mortgage, and deed of trust were made shall have been fully paid. In the event of default in payment or in any agreements of the corporation made as a part of the contract under which the bonds were issued, whether contained in the proceedings authorizing the bonds or in any mortgage or deed of trust executed as security for the bonds, the rights of the bondholders may be enforced by mandamus, the appointment of a receiver in equity, or by foreclosure of any such mortgage or deed of trust, or any one or more of the remedies.

Laws 1972, LB 1517, § 11;

Laws 1995, LB 494, § 10.